New York, session 2025-2026, A5845.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1704-a of the vehicle and traffic law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 5 to read as follows: 3 5. Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, no employee of the 4 city of New York or the New York city fire department in a title whose 5 duties are those of an emergency medical technician or advanced emergen- 6 cy medical technician (as those terms are defined in section three thou- 7 sand one of the public health law), or in a title whose duties require 8 the supervision of employees whose duties are those of an emergency 9 medical technician or advanced emergency medical technician (as those 10 terms are defined in section three thousand one of the public health 11 law), shall be charged a central business district toll; and, further, 12 no employee of the city of New York or the New York city fire department 13 in a title whose duties are those of a fire protection inspector or 14 associate fire protection inspector, or in a title whose duties require 15 the supervision of employees whose duties are those of a fire protection 16 inspector or associate fire protection inspector, shall be charged a 17 central business district toll. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09687-01-5